browser/locales/l10n/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX pS Y 137
SFX pS oir oir/n'q'd'l'm't's' oir po:infi
SFX pS sseoir sseyant/n'q'd'l'm't's' seoir po:ppre
SFX pS ssoir sseyant/n'q'd'l'm't's' soir po:ppre
SFX pS sseoir ssoyant/n'q'd'l'm't's' seoir po:ppre
SFX pS ssoir ssoyant/n'q'd'l'm't's' soir po:ppre
SFX pS sseoir ssis/L'D'Q' seoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX pS sseoir ssise/L'D'Q' seoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pS sseoir ssises/D'Q' seoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pS ssoir ssis/L'D'Q' soir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX pS ssoir ssise/L'D'Q' soir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pS ssoir ssises/D'Q' soir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pS sseoir ssieds/j'n'q'l'm't' seoir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssied/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pS sseoir sseyons/n'q'l't' seoir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pS sseoir sseyez/n'q'l'm' seoir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pS sseoir sseyent/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssois/j'n'q'l'm't' seoir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoit/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoyons/n'q'l't' seoir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoyez/n'q'l'm' seoir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssieds/j'n'q'l'm't' soir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssied/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pS ssoir sseyons/n'q'l't' soir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pS ssoir sseyez/n'q'l'm' soir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pS ssoir sseyent/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssois/j'n'q'l'm't' soir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoit/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoyons/n'q'l't' soir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoyez/n'q'l'm' soir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoient/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX pS sseoir sseyais/j'n'q'l'm't' seoir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir sseyait/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pS sseoir sseyions/n'q'l't' seoir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX pS sseoir sseyiez/n'q'l'm' seoir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX pS sseoir sseyaient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoyais/j'n'q'l'm't' seoir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoyait/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoyions/n'q'l't' seoir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoyiez/n'q'l'm' seoir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoyaient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pS ssoir sseyais/j'n'q'l'm't' soir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir sseyait/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pS ssoir sseyions/n'q'l't' soir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX pS ssoir sseyiez/n'q'l'm' soir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX pS ssoir sseyaient/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoyais/j'n'q'l'm't' soir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoyait/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoyions/n'q'l't' soir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoyiez/n'q'l'm' soir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoyaient/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssis/j'n'q'l'm't' seoir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssit/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssîmes/n'q'l't' seoir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssîtes/n'q'l'm' seoir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssirent/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pS ssoir ssis/j'n'q'l'm't' soir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssit/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssîmes/n'q'l't' soir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssîtes/n'q'l'm' soir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssirent/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pS sseoir ssiérai/j'n'q'l'm't' seoir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pS sseoir ssiéras/n'q'l'm't' seoir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssiéra/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssiérons/n'q'l't' seoir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssiérez/n'q'l'm' seoir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssiéront/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:ifut po:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoirai/j'n'q'l'm't' seoir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoiras/n'q'l'm't' seoir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoira/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoirons/n'q'l't' seoir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoirez/n'q'l'm' seoir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoiront/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pS ssoir ssiérai/j'n'q'l'm't' soir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pS ssoir ssiéras/n'q'l'm't' soir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssiéra/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssiérons/n'q'l't' soir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssiérez/n'q'l'm' soir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssiéront/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pS ssoir ssoirai/j'n'q'l'm't' soir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoiras/n'q'l'm't' soir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoira/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoirons/n'q'l't' soir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoirez/n'q'l'm' soir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoiront/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:ifut po:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssiérais/j'n'q'l'm't' seoir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssiérait/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:cond po:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssiérions/n'q'l't' seoir po:cond po:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssiériez/n'q'l'm' seoir po:cond po:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssiéraient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:cond po:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoirais/j'n'q'l'm't' seoir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoirait/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:cond po:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoirions/n'q'l't' seoir po:cond po:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoiriez/n'q'l'm' seoir po:cond po:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoiraient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:cond po:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssiérais/j'n'q'l'm't' soir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssiérait/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:cond po:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssiérions/n'q'l't' soir po:cond po:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssiériez/n'q'l'm' soir po:cond po:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssiéraient/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:cond po:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoirais/j'n'q'l'm't' soir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoirait/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:cond po:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoirions/n'q'l't' soir po:cond po:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoiriez/n'q'l'm' soir po:cond po:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoiraient/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:cond po:3pl
SFX pS sseoir sseye/j'n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pS sseoir sseyes/n'q'l'm't' seoir po:spre po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoie/j'n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoies/n'q'l'm't' seoir po:spre po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir sseye/j'n'q'l'm't's' soir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pS ssoir sseyes/n'q'l'm't' soir po:spre po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoie/j'n'q'l'm't's' soir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoies/n'q'l'm't' soir po:spre po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssisse/j'n'q'l'm't' seoir po:simp po:1sg
SFX pS sseoir ssisses/n'q'l'm't' seoir po:simp po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssît/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:simp po:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssissions/n'q'l't' seoir po:simp po:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssissiez/n'q'l'm' seoir po:simp po:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssissent/n'q'l'm't's' seoir po:simp po:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssisse/j'n'q'l'm't' soir po:simp po:1sg
SFX pS ssoir ssisses/n'q'l'm't' soir po:simp po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssît/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:simp po:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssissions/n'q'l't' soir po:simp po:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssissiez/n'q'l'm' soir po:simp po:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssissent/n'q'l'm't's' soir po:simp po:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssieds/n'l'm't' seoir po:impe po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir sseyons/n'l't' seoir po:impe po:1pl
SFX pS sseoir sseyez/n'l'm' seoir po:impe po:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssois/n'l'm't' seoir po:impe po:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoyons/n'l't' seoir po:impe po:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoyez/n'l'm' seoir po:impe po:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssieds/n'l'm't' soir po:impe po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir sseyons/n'l't' soir po:impe po:1pl
SFX pS ssoir sseyez/n'l'm' soir po:impe po:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssois/n'l'm't' soir po:impe po:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoyons/n'l't' soir po:impe po:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoyez/n'l'm' soir po:impe po:2pl
